Utah statutes.
78B-2-222.   Actions to recover estate sold by executor or administrator.
An action for the recovery of an estate sold by an executor or administrator
in the course of a probate proceeding shall be maintained by an heir or other
person claiming under the decedent within three years after the sale.  An
action to set aside the sale shall be instituted and maintained within three
years from the discovery of the fraud or other lawful grounds upon which the
action is based.
